Illinois, session 104th, SB4119.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4ARTICLE 15    Section 1. The following named amounts, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 7purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated to the Capital 8Development Board:9GENERAL OFFICE10Payable from Capital Development Fund:11  For Personal Services.............................5,520,30012  For State Contributions to State13   Employees' Retirement System.....................2,398,90014  For State Contributions to15   Social Security....................................415,30016  For Group Insurance...............................1,374,40017    Total                                          $9,708,90018Payable from Capital Development Board Revolving Fund:19  For Personal Services............................19,896,50020  For State Contributions to State21   Employees' Retirement System.....................8,646,10022  For State Contributions to23   Social Security..................................1,521,200  SB4119- 2 -OMB104 00225 CEL 10225 b1  For Group Insurance...............................5,652,0002  For Contractual Services..........................2,148,9003  For Job Related Outreach.............................50,0004  For Travel..........................................300,0005  For Commodities......................................25,0006  For Printing.........................................10,0007  For Equipment.......................................475,0008  For Electronic Data Processing......................350,0009  For Telecommunication Services......................230,00010  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................30,00011  For Facility Condition Assessments12  and Analyses......................................2,500,00013  For Project Management Tracking...................4,500,00014  For Operational Expenses..........................1,000,00015    Total                                         $47,334,700 16    Section 5. The sum of $500,000, or so much thereof as may 17be necessary, is appropriated from the Energy Transition 18Assistance Fund to the Capital Development Board for 19operational expenses and administration of the Energy 20Transition Act, including the creation and adoption of the 21Illinois Stretch Energy Code. 22    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 232026.